Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-618
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Nebraska Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., as the act existed on September 1, 2007, but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101 of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(a), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103 of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2007, LB136, § 9.